Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Stieglitz Collection

4-20-201. Fisk University Stieglitz Collection Art Endowment Fund.

The Fisk University Stieglitz Collection Art Endowment Fund is hereby created under the supervision of the Tennessee arts commission.

Such fund shall operate as an irrevocable trust fund within the state treasury and shall be administered by the state treasurer. The terms of the trust instrument shall be approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The trustees of the trust fund shall be the board of trustees of Fisk University. The members of the Tennessee arts commission shall serve in an ex officio capacity as an advisory committee to such trustees. The state treasurer shall serve as chair of the advisory committee.

The trustees shall set the investment policy for the trust in accordance with the laws, guidelines and policies that govern investments by the Tennessee consolidated retirement system. The state treasurer is responsible for investment of trust funds in accordance with the policy established by the trustees.

The trust shall include funds appropriated for the purpose of funding the trust, individual contributions, corporate contributions, contributions by any other public or private entity and the earnings thereon.

The corpus of the trust shall not be expended for any purpose.

Income from the trust shall only be expended to employ a curator, security staff and other employees necessary to allow the Stieglitz Collection at Fisk University to be open to the public, to enable other art exhibits at Fisk University to be open to the public, to employ a docent to prepare educational materials and tours, to provide public information concerning the availability of the artistic and cultural resources at Fisk University, and to provide other necessary staff or services to implement the preceding purposes. No funds may be expended for such purposes until the requirements of subsection (g) have been fulfilled.

In consideration of the funds made available to Fisk University pursuant to this part, the university shall execute an agreement with the state to admit, for education purposes and free of admission or any other fees, any junior or senior high school student enrolled in any public school who is accompanied by a teacher to the Stieglitz Collection or any other art exhibit that receives funds pursuant to this part that is otherwise open to the public.

All moneys in the trust fund may be commingled for investment with other trust funds and other funds subject to investment by the state treasurer.

Acts 1987, ch. 398, § 1.

4-20-202. Appropriation to further artistic and cultural purposes.

There is appropriated an additional sum of eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) annually to the Tennessee arts commission for the purpose of making an annual grant of that amount to Fisk University to employ a curator, security staff and other employees necessary to allow the Stieglitz Collection at Fisk University to be open to the public, to enable other art exhibits at Fisk University to be open to the public, to employ a docent to prepare educational materials and tours, to provide public information concerning the availability of the artistic and cultural resources at Fisk University, and to provide other necessary staff or services to implement the preceding purposes. The appropriation in this section is to become effective only if adopted as an amendment to the general appropriations act.

Acts 1987, ch. 398, § 2.